California, session 20252026, AB1330.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 42050 of the Public Resources Code is amended to read:42050. Consistent with the policy goal established in Section 41780.01 and consistent with the waste hierarchy established in Section 40051, producers of covered material sold, offered for sale, imported, or distributed in the state shall achieve all of the following with respect to the materials for which they are the producers:(a) All plastic covered material is source reduced pursuant to the requirements established set forth in Section 42057 and paragraph (6) of subdivision (a) of Section 42060.(b) Ensure that all covered material offered for sale, distributed, or imported in or into the state on or after January 1, 2032, is recyclable in the state or eligible for being labeled “compostable” in accordance with Chapter 5.7 (commencing with Section 42355).(c) Ensure that all plastic covered material offered for sale, distributed, or imported in or into the state achieves the following recycling rates:(1) Not less than 30 percent of covered material on and after January 1, 2028.(2) Not less than 40 percent of covered material on and after January 1, 2030.(3) Not less than 65 percent of covered material on and after January 1, 2032.